Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3318
Legal expense insurers; acts; not applicable.

An insurer whose purposes according to its articles of incorporation are restricted to transacting legal expense insurance and business reasonably related thereto shall not be a member of the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association described in Chapter 44, article 24, or the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association described in Chapter 44, article 27. The Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act and the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act shall not be applicable to legal expense insurance issued by an insurer whose purposes according to its articles of incorporation are restricted to transacting legal expense insurance and business reasonably related thereto.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 18.

Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act, see section 44-2720.

Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act, see section 44-2418.